Utah statutes.
16-6a-1104.   Effect of merger.
(1)  When a merger takes effect:
(a)  every domestic corporation, foreign corporation, domestic nonprofit
corporation, or foreign nonprofit corporation party to the merger merges into
the surviving domestic nonprofit corporation;
(b)  the separate existence of every domestic corporation, foreign
corporation, domestic nonprofit corporation, or foreign nonprofit corporation
party to the merger except the surviving domestic nonprofit corporation
ceases;
(c)  the title to all real estate and other property owned by every domestic
corporation, foreign corporation, domestic nonprofit corporation, or foreign
nonprofit corporation party to the merger is transferred to and vested in the
surviving domestic nonprofit corporation without reversion or impairment;
(d)  the surviving domestic nonprofit corporation has all liabilities of each
domestic corporation, foreign corporation, domestic nonprofit corporation, or
foreign nonprofit corporation party to the merger;
(e) (i)  a proceeding pending by or against any party to the merger may be
continued as if the merger did not occur; or
(ii)  the surviving domestic nonprofit corporation may be substituted in the
proceeding for the party to the merger whose existence ceased;
(f)  the articles of incorporation of the surviving domestic nonprofit
corporation are amended to the extent provided in the plan of merger; and
(g)  the shares or memberships of each domestic corporation, foreign
corporation, domestic nonprofit corporation, or foreign nonprofit corporation
party to the merger that are to be converted into shares, memberships,
obligations, or other interests of the surviving domestic nonprofit
corporation or into money or other property are converted, and the former
holders of the shares and memberships are entitled only to the rights provided
in the articles of merger.
(2) (a)  A transfer to and vesting in the surviving domestic nonprofit
corporation described in Subsection (1)(c) occurs by operation of law.
(b)  Consent or approval of any other person may not be required in connection
with any transfer or vesting unless the consent or approval is specifically
required in the event of merger by:
(i)  law; or
(ii)  express provision in any contract, agreement, decree, order, or other
instrument to which any of the domestic corporations, foreign corporations,
domestic nonprofit corporations, or foreign nonprofit corporations so merged
is a party or by which it is bound.
